Washington statutes.
RCW 10.105.900

Application.

This chapter does not apply to property subject to forfeiture under chapter 66.32 RCW, RCW 69.50.505, 9.41.098, 9.46.231, 9A.82.100, 9A.83.030, or 77.15.070.

[ 2023 c 102 s 9; 2003 c 39 s 6; 1994 c 218 s 18; 1993 c 288 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 218: See note following RCW 9.46.010.